Utah statutes.
53A-6-503.   Reimbursement of legal fees and costs to educators.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Action" means any action, except those referred to in Section 52-6-201,
brought against an educator by an individual or entity other than:
(i)  the entity who licenses the educator; and
(ii)  the school district that employs the educator or employed the educator
at the time of the alleged act or omission.
(b)  "Educator" means an individual who holds or is required to hold a license
under this chapter and is employed by a school district located within the
state.
(c)  "School district" includes the Schools for the Deaf and the Blind and the
state's applied technology centers.
(2)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 52-6-201, an educator is entitled
to recover reasonable attorneys' fees and costs incurred in the educator’s
defense against an individual or entity who initiates an action against the
educator if:
(a)  the action is brought for any act or omission of the educator during the
performance of the educator's duties within the scope of the educator's
employment; and
(b)  it is dismissed or results in findings favorable to the educator.
(3)  An educator who recovers under this section is also entitled to recover
reasonable attorneys' fees and costs necessarily incurred by the educator in
recovering the attorneys' fees and costs allowed under Subsection (2).
